Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.190

Organization of annexation review board—Rules—Journal—Authority.

The members of each annexation review board shall elect from among the members a chair and a vice chair, and may employ a nonmember as chief clerk, who shall be the secretary of the board. The board shall determine its own rules and order of business, shall provide by resolution for the time and manner of holding regular or special meetings, and shall keep a journal of its proceedings which shall be a public record. A majority of all the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The chief clerk of the board, the chair, or the vice chair shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas to any public officer or employee ordering him or her to testify before the board and produce public records, papers, books or documents. The chief clerk, the chair or the vice chair may invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction to carry out such powers.

The planning departments of the county, other counties, and any city, and any state or regional planning agency shall furnish such information to the board at its request as may be reasonably necessary for the performance of its duties.

At the request of the board, the state attorney general shall provide counsel for the board.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3030; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.190.]